Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
157

MILK
CONTROL ACT

Part I. General Provisions

Section

157-1 Definitions

Part II. Administration, Powers and Duties

157-11, 12 Repealed

157-13 General powers

157-14 Inspection and investigation

157-15 Audit of books and accounts

157-16 Repealed

157-17 Accounting of licensees

157-18 Report to governor

Part III. Licensing

157-21 Licensing

157-22 Application for license and payment of fee

157-23 License fees

157-24 Granting, suspending, and revoking
licenses

157-25 Proceedings to review

157-26 Records of licensees

157-27 Reports of licensees

157-28 Repealed

157-29 Milk control special fund

Part IV. Establishment of a Milk Shed and
the Setting

of Minimum Prices and Quotas

157-30 Petition to establish or terminate a milk
shed

157-31 Petition to establish, revise, or
terminate minimum

prices, salvage values, and quotas

157-32 Standards to determine minimum prices

157-33 Order fixing minimum price, salvage value

157-34 Determination of quotas

157-34.5 Milk shortage

157-35 Compensatory payment

Part V. Remedies, Violations, Compacts,
Construction

157-41 Remedies; penalties

157-42 Interstate and federal compacts

157-43 Construction

Cross References

Sale of "island
fresh" milk, see §486-120.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next